Missouri, session 2026, HB2364.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 143, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 143.1250, to read as follows:
143.1250. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Deduction", an amount subtracted to determine the taxpayer's Missouri
taxable income for a given tax year;
(2) "Employer", the same meaning as such term is defined under section
143.191;
(3) "Jury duty compensation", any daily compensation, mileage allowance,
additional daily compensation or mileage allowance, fees, or other amounts authorized
under section 494.455, local law or ordinance, for the compensation of jurors;
(4) "Regular employment", any full-time, part-time, temporary, or casual
employment if the employment hours may be determined by a schedule, custom, or
practice established during the three-month period preceding the employee's summons
for jury duty;
(5) "Regular wages" or "wages", the same meaning as such term is defined
under section 143.191, that are received in the course of regular employment for the
purposes of this section;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2364 2
(6) "Self-employed individual", an individual who is eighteen years of age or
older, is self-employed, and has self-employment income or other compensation from
self-employment that is allocable to the state of Missouri;
(7) "Taxpayer", any individual, firm, partner in a firm, corporation,
partnership, shareholder in an S corporation, or member of a limited liability
company subject to the income tax imposed under this chapter, who is an employer.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, in addition to all other
deductions and modifications allowed by law, a taxpayer shall be allowed a deduction up
to one hundred percent of the regular wages received from regular employment paid to
an employee while such employee was serving jury duty, minus any amount of the
employee's jury duty compensation remitted to the employer.
3. The term "employee" shall include, but not be limited to, a self-employed
individual for the purposes of this section.
4. Any taxpayer allowed a deduction under this section who is found to have
violated section 494.460 or 28 U.S.C. Section 1875 in relation to the rights of the
employee whose wages are claimed for such deduction shall be ineligible to receive a
deduction under this section for the tax year in which such violation occurred, or if such
violation is discovered within one year of receiving such deduction, shall repay the
amount of tax savings realized from the deduction to the state. The department of
revenue may request any such information or documentation to verify compliance with
the provisions of this subsection.
5. Notwithstanding any provision of section 105.1500 to the contrary, any
requirement to provide information, documents, or records under this section, and any
requirement established by the department of revenue to provide information,
documents, or records for the purpose of administering and enforcing this section,
including upon the department’s request, shall be exempt from section 105.1500.
6. The department of revenue shall promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
7. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:

HB 2364 3
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly; and
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
✔